en: E528, Magnesium hydroxide
xx: E528
bg: E528, Магнезиев хидроксид
ca: E528, Hidròxid de magnesi, hidroxid de magnesi
cs: E528, Hydroxid hořečnatý
da: E528, Magnesiumhydroxid
de: E528, Magnesiumhydroxid
el: E528, Υδροξειδιο του μαγνησιου
es: E528, Hidróxido magnésico, Hidróxido de magnesio, Leche de magnesia
et: E528, Magneesiumhüdroksiid
fi: E528, Magnesiumhydroksidi, Magnesiamaito, Magnesiumhydroksidia, Magnesiamaitoa
fr: E528, Hydroxyde de magnésium, Hydrate de magnésie, Lait de magnésie, Magnésium hydroxyde de, Magnésie hydratée
hu: E528, Magnézium-hidroxid
it: E528, Idrossido di magnesio, Magnesio idrossido
lt: E528, Magnio hidroksidas
lv: E528, Magnija hidroksīds
mt: E528, Idrossidu tal-manjeżju
nl: E528, Magnesiumhydroxide
pl: E528, Wodorotlenek magnezu
pt: E528, Hidróxido de magnésio
ro: E528, Hidroxid de magneziu
sk: E528, Hydroxid horečnatý
sl: E528, Magnezijev hidroksid
sv: E528, Magnesiumhydroxid

en: E529, Calcium oxide
xx: E529
af: E529, Ongebluste kalk
an: E529, Calso
ar: E529, أكسيد الكالسيوم
ay: E529, Q'atawi
bg: E529, Калциев оксид, Негасена вар
bn: E529, ক্যালসিয়াম অক্সাইড
bs: E529, Kalcij-oksid
ca: E529, Òxid de calci, oxid de calci
cs: E529, Oxid vápenatý, Vápno, Nehašené vápno, Pálené vápno, Kysličník vápenatý
da: E529, Calciumoxid, Kalciumoxid, Brændt kalk
de: E529, Calciumoxid, Kalziumoxid, Ätzkalk, Freikalk, Branntkalk, Kalkerde, Hartbrannt, Feinkalk, Brandkalk, Weichbrannt, E 529, gebrannter Kalk, ungelöschter Kalk
el: E529, Οξειδιο του ασβεστιου
eo: E529, kalcia oksido
es: E529, Óxido de calcio, Cal viva, Caliche, Óxido cálcico, Calcareo
et: E529, Kaltsiumoksiid, Kustutamata lubi, Põletatud lubi
eu: E529, Kaltzio oxido
fa: E529, کلسیم اکسید
fi: E529, Kalsiumoksidi, Poltettu kalkki, Kalkki, Sammuttamaton kalkki, Kalsiumoksidia, Poltettua kalkkia, Kalkkia, Sammuttamatonta kalkkia
fr: E529, Oxyde de calcium, chaux vive
gl: E529, Cal
he: E529, סיד
hr: E529, Živo vapno
hu: E529, Kalcium-oxid
hy: E529, Կալցիումի օքսիդ
id: E529, Kapur tohor
it: E529, Ossido di calcio
ja: E529, 酸化カルシウム, 酸化Ca, 酸化Ｃａ
kk: E529, Сөндірілмеген әк
ko: E529, 생석회
ky: E529, Кальций оксиди
lt: E529, Kalcio oksidas
lv: E529, Kalcija oksīds, Nedzēstais kaļķis, Nedzēsti kaļķi
ml: E529, നീറ്റുകക്ക
mt: E529, Ossidu tal-kalċju
my: E529, ထုံး
nb: E529, Kalsiumoksid
nl: E529, Calciumoxide, Ongebluste kalk, Calciumoxyde
oc: E529, Calç
pl: E529, Tlenek wapnia, Wapno palone, Wapno kalcynowane
pt: E529, Óxido de cálcio, Cal, Caiação, Cal viva
ro: E529, Oxid de calciu
sh: E529, Kalcijum oksid
sk: E529, Oxid vápenatý, Pálené vápno
sl: E529, Kalcijev oksid, Žgano apno
sr: E529, калцијум оксид
sv: E529, Kalciumoxid, Bränd kalk, Osläckt kalk, Bränt kalk, Packsten
ta: E529, கால்சியம் ஆக்சைடு
th: E529, แคลเซียมออกไซด์
tl: E529, Calcium oxide
tr: E529, kalsiyum oksit
tt: E529, кәлси әчемәсе
uk: E529, Оксид кальцію
uz: E529, Ohak
vi: E529, Canxi ôxít
zh: E529, 氧化鈣

en: E530, Magnesium oxide, magnesia
xx: E530
ar: E530, أكسيد المغنسيوم
be: E530, Магнію аксід
bg: E530, Магнезиев оксид
ca: E530, Òxid de magnesi, oxid de magnesi
cs: E530, Oxid hořečnatý
cy: E530, Magnesiwm ocsid
da: E530, Magnesiumoxid
de: E530, Magnesiumoxid, Bittererde, Weiße Magnesia
el: E530, Οξειδιο του μαγνησιου
eo: E530, magnezia oksido
es: E530, Óxido de magnesio, Óxido magnésico
et: E530, Magneesiumoksiid
fa: E530, اکسید منیزیم
fi: E530, Magnesiumoksidi, Magnesiumoksidia
fr: E530, Oxyde de magnésium Périclase, Oxyde de magnésium
he: E530, תחמוצת המגנזיום
hi: E530, मैग्निसियम ऑक्साइड
hr: E530, Magnezijev oksid
hu: E530, Magnézium-oxid
hy: E530, Մագնեզիումի օքսիդ
id: E530, Magnesium oksida
it: E530, Ossido di magnesio, magnesia
ja: E530, 酸化マグネシウム, 酸化Mg, 酸化Ｍｇ
ko: E530, 산화 마그네슘
ky: E530, Магний оксиди
lt: E530, Magnio oksidas
lv: E530, Magnija oksīds
mn: E530, Магнийн исэл
mt: E530, Ossidu tal-manjeżju
nb: E530, Magnesiumoksid
nl: E530, Magnesiumoxide
nn: E530, Magnesiumoksid
pl: E530, Tlenek magnezu
pt: E530, Óxido de magnésio
qu: E530, Qunta
ro: E530, Oxid de magneziu
ru: E530, Оксид магния
sh: E530, Magnezijum oksid
sk: E530, Oxid horečnatý
sl: E530, Magnezijev oksid
sr: E530, магнезијум оксид
sv: E530, Magnesiumoxid
th: E530, แมกนีเซียมออกไซด์
uk: E530, Оксид магнію
uz: E530, Magniy oksid
vi: E530, Magiê ôxít
zh: E530, 氧化镁

en: E535, Sodium ferrocyanide, Yellow prussiate of soda
xx: E535
bg: E535, Натриев фероцианид
ca: E535, Ferrocianur de sodi
cs: E535, Hexakyanoželeznatan sodný
da: E535, Natriumferrocyanid
de: E535, Natriumferrocyanid, Gelbnatron, Natriumhexacyanidoferrat(II), Natriumhexacyanidoferrat, Natriumhexacyanoferrat(II), E 535, Natrium-hexakis-cyanoferrat, Natriumhexacyanoferrat
el: E535, Σιδηροκυανιουχο νατριο, Πρωσσικό κίτρινο της σόδας
es: E535, Ferrocianuro de sodio, Ferrocianuro sódico, Prusiato de sodio
et: E535, Naatriumheksatsüanoferraat(ii)
fi: E535, Natriumferrosyanidi, Natriumferrosyanidia
fr: E535, Ferrocyanure de sodium, ferronitrile de sodium, Prussiate jaune de sodium
hu: E535, Nátrium-ferro-cianid, Nátrium-ferrocianid
it: E535, Ferrocianuro di sodio
lt: E535, Natrio ferocianidas, Sodos geltonasis prusidas
lv: E535, Nātrija ferocianīds, Nātrija dzeltenais asinssāls
mt: E535, Ferroċjanur tas-sodju, Prussjat isfar tas-soda
nl: E535, Natriumhexacyanoferraat(ii), Natriumferrocyanide, Natriumhexacyanoferraat, Natriumijzercyanide, Tetranatriumhexacyanoferraat
pl: E535, Żelazocyjanek sodu, Żółty prusydek sodu
pt: E535, Ferrocianeto de sódio, Prussianato amarelo de soda
ro: E535, Ferocianură de sodiu, Prusiat galben de sodiu
sk: E535, Ferokyanid sodný, Žltý kyanid sodný
sl: E535, Natrijev ferocianid, Yellow prussiate of soda
sv: E535, Natriumferrocyanid, E 535

en: E536, Potassium ferrocyanide, Yellow prussiate of potash
xx: E536
bg: E536, Калиев фероцианид
ca: E536, Ferrocianur de potassi
cs: E536, Hexakyanoželeznatan draselný, Žlutá krevní sůl, Hexakyanido-železnatan draselný, Hexakyanidoželeznatan draselný, Ferrokyanid draselný, E 536, Hexakyano-železnatan draslený
da: E536, Kaliumferrocyanid
de: E536, Kaliumferrocyanid, Gelbkali, Kaliumhexacyanidoferrat(II), Tetrakaliumhexacyanoferrat, Gelbes Blutlaugensalz, Kaliumferrozyanid, Blaukali, Kaliumhexacyanoferrat(II), E 536, K4Fe(CN)6, Ferrocyankalium
el: E536, Σιδηροκυανιουχο καλιο, Πρωσσικό κίτρινο της ποτάσσας, Σιδηροεξακυανούχο κάλιο
es: E536, Ferrocianuro de potasio, Ferrocianuro potásico, Prusiato de potasa, Hexacianoferrato (II) de potasio trihidratado
et: E536, Kaaliumheksatsüanoferraat(ii), Kollane veresool
fi: E536, Kaliumferrosyanidi, Kaliumferrosyanidia
fr: E536, Ferrocyanure de potassium, ferronitrile de potassium, K4Fe(CN)6, 13943-58-3, 14459-95-1, C6FeK4N6
hr: E536
hu: E536, Kálium-ferro-cianid, Kálium-ferro-cianid, Sárgavérlúgsó, Kálium-ferrocianid
it: E536, Ferrocianuro di potassio, K4(Fe(CN)6)·3H2O
lt: E536, Kalio ferocianidas, Šarmo geltonasis prusidas
lv: E536, Kālija ferocianīds, Kālija dzeltenais asinssāls, Kālija heksacianoferāts
mt: E536, Ferroċjanur tal-potassju, Prussjat isfar tal-potassa
nl: E536, Kaliumhexacyanoferraat(ii), Kaliumhexacyanoferraat, geel bloedloogzout, Kaliumhexaferrocyanide, Kaliumferrocyanide
pl: E536, Żelazocyjanek potasu, Żółty prusydek potasu, Heksacyjanożelazian(II) potasu, E-536, Sól żółta
pt: E536, Ferrocianeto de potássio, Prussianato amarelo de potassa
ro: E536, Ferocianură de potasiu, Prusiat galben de potasiu
ru: E536, ферроцианид калия
sk: E536, Ferokyanid draselný, Žltá krvná soľ, Hexakyanoželeznatan draselný, Hexakyanidoželeznatan draselný
sl: E536, Kalijev ferocianid, Yellow prussiate of potash
sv: E536, Kaliumferrocyanid, Gult blodlutsalt, E 536

en: E537, ferrous hexacyanomanganate
xx: E537
bg: E537, ферозен хексацианоманганат
cs: E537, železný hexacyanomanganát
da: E537, ferro hexacyanomanganat
de: E537, ferrohexacyanomanganat
el: E537, σιδηρούχο εξακυανομαγγανικό
es: E537, hexacianomanganato ferroso
et: E537, rauaheksatsüanomanganaat
fi: E537, Rautaheksasyanomanganaatti, Rautaheksasyanomanganaattia
fr: E537, hexacyanomanganate ferreux, Hexacyanomanganate de fer, ferrohexacyanomanganate
hu: E537, vas-hexacyanomagnát, vas-hexacianomangánát
it: E537, esacianomanganato ferroso
lt: E537, geležies heksacianomanganatas
lv: E537, dzelzs heksacianomangānāts
mt: E537, e537 food additive
nl: E537, ferrohexacyanomanganaat
pl: E537, heksacyjanomanganian(II) żelazawy
pt: E537, hexacianomanganato ferroso
ro: E537, hexacianomanganat ferros
sk: E537, železný hexacyanomanganát
sl: E537, železov heksacianomanganat
sv: E537, ferrohexacyanomanganat

en: E538, Calcium ferrocyanide, Yellow prussiate of lime
xx: E538
bg: E538, Калциев фероцианид
ca: E538, Ferrocianur de calci
cs: E538, Hexakyanoželeznatan vápenatý
da: E538, Calciumferrocyanid
de: E538, Calciumferrocyanid, Gelbcalcium
el: E538, Σιδηροκυανιουχο ασβεστιο, Πρωσσικό κίτρινο της ασβέστου
es: E538, Ferrocianuro cálcico, Prusiato de cal
et: E538, Kaltsiumheksatsüanoferraat(ii)
fi: E538, Kalsiumferrosyanidi, Kalsiumferrosyanidia
fr: E538, Ferrocyanure de calcium
hu: E538, Kalcium-ferro-cianid, Kalcium-ferrocianid
it: E538, Ferrocianuro di calcio
lt: E538, Kalcio ferocianidas, Kalcio geltonasis prusidas
lv: E538, Kalcija ferocianīds, Kalcija dzeltenais asinssāls
mt: E538, Ferroċjanur tal-kalċju, Prussjat isfar tal-ġir
nl: E538, Calciumhexacyanoferraat(ii)
pl: E538, Żelazocyjanek wapnia, Żółty prusydek wapna
pt: E538, Ferrocianeto de cálcio, Prussianato amarelo de cal
ro: E538, Ferocianură de calciu, Prusiat galben de calciu
sk: E538, Ferokyanid vápenatý, Žltý kyanid vápenatý
sl: E538, Kalcijev ferocianid, Yellow prussiate of lime
sv: E538, Kalciumferrocyanid

en: E539, sodium thiosulfate
xx: E539
cs: E539, Thiosíran sodný, E 539, Na2S2O3, Sirnatan sodný, Thiosulfát sodný
da: E539, Natriumthiosulfat, Fiksersalt
de: E539, Natriumthiosulfat, Fixiernatron, Unterschwefligsaures Natrium, Fixiersalz, Antichlor, Na2S2O3, Natrium hydrosulfurosum, NaS2O3
es: E539, Tiosulfato de sodio
fi: E539, Natriumtiosulfaatti, Natriumhyposulfiitti, Natriumtiosulfaattia, Natriumhyposulfiittia
fr: E539, Thiosulfate de sodium, Na2S2O3, 7772-98-7, Hyposulfite de sodium
hu: E539, Nátrium-tioszulfát
it: E539, tiosolfato di sodio, Iposolfito di sodio, Na2S2O3·5H2O
lv: E539, Nātrija tiosulfāts, Hiposulfīts, Na2S2O3, Nātrija hiposulfīts, Antihlors
nl: E539, Natriumthiosulfaat, Na2S2O3
pl: E539, Tiosiarczan sodu, Tiosiarczan sodowy
pt: E539, Tiossulfato de sódio, Tiosulfato de sódio
ro: E539, Tiosulfat de sodiu
sk: E539, Tiosíran sodný
sl: E539, Natrijev tiosulfat
sv: E539, Natriumtiosulfat, Hyposulfitsoda

en: E551, Silicon dioxide, Silica, SiO2
xx: E551
an: E551, Silica
ar: E551, ثنائي أكسيد السيليكون
az: E551, Lüssatit
bg: E551, Силициев диоксид
bn: E551, সিলিকন ডাই অক্সাইড
bs: E551, Silicij-dioksid
ca: E551, Diòxid de silici, dioxid de silici
cs: E551, Oxid křemičitý
da: E551, Siliciumdioxid
de: E551, Siliciumdioxid, Kieselsäure
el: E551, Διοξειδιο του πυριτιου, Πυριτία
eo: E551, silicia dioksido
es: E551, Dióxido de silicio, Sílice, óxido de silicio IV
et: E551, Ränidioksiid
eu: E551, Silizio dioxido
fa: E551, سیلیسیم دی‌اکسید
fi: E551, Piidioksidi, Silika, Piidioksidia, Silikaa, paakkuuntumisenestoaine E551
fr: E551, Dioxyde de silicium, silice, Gel bleu de silice, Gel 60 de silice, Dioxyde de silicium, Silicon dioxide, terre diatomée, terre de diatomée, Silica, CI 7811, Cab-o-sil, Diatomaceous earth calcined, Diatomaceous silica, Dioxosilane, Pigment White 27, Silanox 101, Siliceous earth, Silicon dioxide, Solum diatomeae, White carbon
ga: Silice
he: E551, צורן דו-חמצני
hi: E551, सिलिका
hr: E551, Silicijev dioksid, silicijum dioksid
hu: E551, Szilícium-dioxid, Szilika
hy: E551, Սիլիցիումի երկօքսիդ
id: E551, Silikon dioksida
io: E551, Silico
it: E551, Biossido di silicio, Silice
ja: E551, 二酸化ケイ素, 微粒二酸化ケイ素
kk: E551, Кремний оксиді
ko: E551, 이산화 규소
ky: E551, Кремний кош оксиди
la: E551, silica
lt: E551, Silicio dioksidas, Kvarcas
lv: E551, Silīcija dioksīds, Silīcija dioksīds (silica
mk: E551, Силициум диоксид
mn: E551, Цахиурын давхар исэл
ms: E551, Silikon dioksida
mt: E551, Diossidu tas-silikon, Silika
my: E551, ကျောက်သလင်း
nb: E551, silisiumdioksid
nl: E551, Siliciumdioxide, Silica
nn: E551, silisiumdioksid
pa: E551, ਸਿਲੀਕਾਨ ਡਾਈਆਕਸਾਈਡ
pl: E551, Dwutlenek krzemu, Krzemionka, Ditlenek krzemu
ps: E551, سليكان ډای اکسايډ
pt: E551, Dióxido de silício
qu: E551, Ullaya
ro: E551, Dioxid de siliciu, Silice
ru: E551, диоксид кремния, агент антислеживающий E551
sh: E551, Silicijum dioksid
sk: E551, Oxid kremičitý, Kremeň
sl: E551, Silicijev dioksid, silikagel
sr: E551, силицијум диоксид, sredstvo protiv zgrudnjavanja E551
sv: E551, Kiseldioxid, Kvarts, klumpförebyggande medel E551, silikondioxid
ta: E551, சிலிக்கா
th: E551, ซิลิกอนไดออกไซด์
tr: E551, Silisyum dioksit
uk: E551, Діоксид кремнію
vi: E551, silic điôxít
zh: E551, 二氧化硅

en: E552, Calcium silicate
xx: E552
bg: E552, Калциев силикат
ca: E552, Silicat de calci
cs: E552, Křemičitan vápenatý
da: E552, Calciumsilicat
de: E552, Calciumsilicat
el: E552, Πυριτικο ασβεστιο
es: E552, Silicato cálcico, silicato de calcio
et: E552, Kaltsiumsilikaat
fi: E552, Kalsiumsilikaatti, Kalsiumsilikaattia
fr: E552, Silicate de calcium, CaSiO3, Ca2SiO4, E-552, 1344-95-2
hu: E552, Kalcium-szilikát
it: E552, Silicato di calcio, Mattoni silico-calcarei
lt: E552, Kalcio silikatas
lv: E552, Kalcija silikāts
mt: E552, Silikat tal-kalċju
nl: E552, Calciumsilicaat
pl: E552, Krzemian wapnia
pt: E552, Silicato de cálcio
ro: E552, Silicat de calciu
sk: E552, Kremičitan vápenatý
sl: E552, Kalcijev silikat
sv: E552, Kalciumsilikat

en: E553, Magnesium silicates, magnesium silicate
xx: E553
bg: E553, Магнезиев силикат
cs: E553, Křemičitan hořečnatý
da: E553, Magnesiumsilicat
de: E553), Magnesiumsilicat, Florisil, Magnesiumsilicat, Magnesiumsilikathydrat
el: E553, Πυριτικο μαγνησιο
es: E553, Silicato magnésico
et: E553, Magneesiumsilikaat
fi: E553, Magnesiumsilikaatti, Magnesiumsilikaattia
fr: E553, Silicate de magnésium, Silicates de magnésium
hu: E553, Magnézium-szilikát, Magnézium-szilikátok
it: E553, Silicato di magnesio
lt: E553, Magnio silikatas
lv: E553, Magnija silikāts
mt: E553, Silikat tal-manjeżju
nl: E553, Magnesiumsilicaat, Magnesiumsilicaten
pl: E553, Krzemian magnezu
pt: E553, Silicato de magnésio
ro: E553, Silicat de magneziu
sk: E553, Kremičitan horečnatý
sl: E553, Magnezijev silikat

en: E553(i), Magnesium silicate\, synthetic
xx: E553(i)

en: E553(ii)
xx: E553(ii)

en: E553(iii)
xx: E553(iii)

en: E553a, synthetic magnesium silicates
xx: E553a
ar: E553a, مجموعة سيليكات المغنيسيوم الاصطناعية
az: E553a, sintetik maqnezium silikatlar
bg: E553a, синтетични магнезиеви силикати
ca: E553a, silicats de magnesi sintètics
cs: E553a, syntetické křemičitany hořečnaté
da: E553a, syntetiske magnesiumsilikater
de: E553a, synthetische Magnesiumsilikate
el: E553a, συνθετικά πυριτικά άλατα μαγνησίου
eo: E553a, sintezaj magneziaj silikatoj
es: E553a, silicatos de magnesio sintéticos
et: E553a, sünteetilised magneesiumsilikaadid
fi: E553a, synteettiset magnesiumsilikaatit
fr: E553a, silicates de magnésium synthétiques
hr: E553a, sintetički magnezijevi silikati
hu: E553a, szintetikus magnézium-szilikátok
it: E553a, silicati di magnesio sintetici
ja: E553a, 合成ケイ酸マグネシウム族
ko: E553a, 합성 마그네슘 규산염
lt: E553a, sintetiniai magnio silikatai
lv: E553a, sintētiskie magnija silikāti
mk: E553a, синтетички магнезиум силикати
mt: E553a, silikati tal-manjeżju sintetiċi
nl: E553a, synthetische magnesiumsilicaten
pl: E553a, syntetyczne krzemiany magnezu
pt: E553a, silicatos de magnésio sintéticos
ro: E553a, silicați de magneziu sintetici
ru: E553a, синтетические силикаты магния
sk: E553a, syntetické kremičitany horečnaté
sl: E553a, sintetični magnezijevi silikati
sq: E553a, silikate sintetike të magnezit
sr: E553a, синтетички магнезијум силикати
sv: E553a, syntetiska magnesiumsilikater
tr: E553a, sentetik magnezyum silikatlar
uk: E553a, синтетичні силікати магнію
zh: E553a, 合成硅酸镁族

en: E553a(i), Synthetic magnesium silicate
xx: E553a(i)
ar: E553a(i), سيليكات المغنيسيوم الاصطناعية
az: E553a(i), Sintetik maqnezium silikat
bg: E553a(i), Синтетичен магнезиев силикат
ca: E553a(i), Silicat de magnesi sintètic
cs: E553a(i), Syntetický křemičitan hořečnatý
da: E553a(i), Syntetisk magnesiumsilikat
de: E553a(i), Synthetisches Magnesiumsilikat
el: E553a(i), Συνθετικό πυριτικό μαγνήσιο
eo: E553a(i), Sinteza magnezia silikato
es: E553a(i), Silicato de magnesio sintético
et: E553a(i), Sünteetiline magneesiumsilikaat
fi: E553a(i), Synteettinen magnesiumsilikaatti
fr: E553a(i), Silicate de magnésium synthétique
hr: E553a(i), Sintetski magnezijev silikat
hu: E553a(i), Szintetikus magnézium-szilikát
it: E553a(i), Magnesio silicato sintetico
ja: E553a(i), 合成ケイ酸マグネシウム
ko: E553a(i), 합성 규산 마그네슘
lt: E553a(i), Sintetinis magnio silikatas
lv: E553a(i), Sintētiskais magnija silikāts
mk: E553a(i), Синтетички магнезиум силикат
mt: E553a(i), Silikat sintetiku tal-manjeżju
nl: E553a(i), Synthetisch magnesiumsilicaat
pl: E553a(i), Syntetyczny krzemian magnezu
pt: E553a(i), Silicato de magnésio sintético
ro: E553a(i), Silicat de magneziu sintetic
ru: E553a(i), Синтетический силикат магния
sk: E553a(i), Syntetický kremičitan horečnatý
sl: E553a(i), Sintetični magnezijev silikat
sq: E553a(i), Silikat sintetik i magnezit
sr: E553a(i), Sintetički magnezijum silikat
sv: E553a(i), Syntetisk magnesiumsilikat
tr: E553a(i), Sentetik magnezyum silikat
uk: E553a(i), Синтетичний силікат магнію
zh: E553a(i), 合成硅酸镁

en: E553a(ii), Magnesium trisilicate
xx: E553a(ii)
bg: E553a(ii), Магнезиев трисиликат
cs: E553a(ii), Trikřemičitan hořečnatý
da: E553a(ii), Magnesiumtrisilicat
de: E553a(ii), Magnesiumtrisilicat
el: E553a(ii), Τριπυριτικο μαγνησιο
es: E553a(ii), Trisilicato magnésico
et: E553a(ii), Magneesiumtrisilikaat
fi: E553a(ii), Magnesiumtrisilikaatti, Magnesiumtrisilikaattia
fr: E553a(ii), Trisilicate de magnésium
hu: E553a(ii), Magnézium-triszilikát
it: E553a(ii), Trisilicato di magnesio
lt: E553a(ii), Magnio trisilikatas
lv: E553a(ii), Magnija trisilikāts
mt: E553a(ii), Trisilikat tal-manjeżju
nl: E553a(ii), Magnesiumtrisilicaat
pl: E553a(ii), Trikrzemian magnezu
pt: E553a(ii), Trissilicato de magnésio
ro: E553a(ii), Trisilicat de magneziu
sk: E553a(ii), Trikremičitan horečnatý
sl: E553a(ii), Magnezijev trisilikat
sv: E553a(ii), Magnesiumtrisilikat

en: E553b, Talc, talcum, hydrated magnesium silicate
xx: E553b
af: E553b, Talk
ar: E553b, تالك
az: E553b, Talk
be: E553b, Тальк
bg: E553b, Талк
bs: E553b, Тальк
ca: E553b, talc
cs: E553b, Talek, Mastek, Steatit
cv: E553b, Тальк
da: E553b, Talkum, Fedtsten, Steatit, Klæbersten
de: E553b, Talkum, Talk, Talcum
el: E553b, Ταλκησ, Τάλκης
eo: E553b, talko
es: E553b, Talco, Talcoso, Esteatita
et: E553b, Talk
eu: E553b, Talko
fa: E553b, تالک
fi: E553b, Talkki, Talkkia
fr: E553b, Talc
ga: E553b, Talc
gl: E553b, Talco
he: E553b, טלק
hi: E553b, टाल्क
hr: E553b, Talkum
hu: E553b, Talkum, Zsírkő
hy: E553b, Տալկ
id: E553b, Talek
io: E553b, Talko
is: E553b, Talk
it: E553b, Talco
ja: E553b, 滑石
ka: E553b, ტალკი
ko: E553b, 활석
ky: E553b, Тальк
la: E553b, Talcum
lt: E553b, Talkas
lv: E553b, Talks
ml: E553b, ടാൽക്
ms: E553b, Talkum
mt: E553b, Terra
nb: E553b, talk
nl: E553b, Talk, Steatiet, Speksteen, Talkpoeder
oc: E553b, Talc
pl: E553b, Talk, Kamień mydlany
pt: E553b, Talco, Pedra sabão, Esteatite, Esteatita
ro: E553b, Talc
ru: E553b, Тальк
sh: E553b, Talk
sk: E553b, Mastenec, Mastenec, Talk
sl: E553b, Smukec, Lojevec
sr: E553b, талк
sv: E553b, Talk
ta: E553b, டால்க்
th: E553b, ทัลก์
tr: E553b, Talk
uk: E553b, Тальк
uz: E553b, Talk
vi: E553b, Tan
yo: E553b, Talc
zh: E553b, 滑石

en: E554, Sodium aluminium silicate, Sodium silicoaluminate, Sodium aluminosilicate
xx: E554
bg: E554, Натриевоалуминиев силикат, Натриев силикоалуминат, натриев алуминосиликат
ca: E554, Silicat de sodi i alumini
cs: E554, Křemičitan sodno-hlinitý
da: E554, Natriumaluminiumsilicat
de: E554, Natriumaluminiumsilicat, Natriumsilicoaluminat, Natriumaluminosilicat
el: E554, Πυριτικο αργιλιονατριο, Αργιλοπυριτικό νάτριο
es: E554, Silicato de sodio y aluminio
et: E554, Naatriumalumiiniumsilikaat
fi: E554, Natriumalumiinisilikaatti, Natriumpiialuminaatti, natriumaluminosilikaatti, Natriumalumiinisilikaattia, Natriumpiialuminaattia, natriumaluminosilikaattia
fr: E554, Silicate alumino-sodique, Silicoaluminate de sodium, aluminosilicate de sodium
hu: E554, Nátrium-alumínium-szilikát, Nátrium-szilikoaluminát, Nátrium-aluminoszilikát
it: E554, Silicato di sodio e alluminio, Silicoalluminato di sodio, alluminosilicato di sodio
lt: E554, Natrio aliuminio silikatas, Natrio silikoaliuminatas, natrio aliuminosilikatas
lv: E554, Nātrija alumīnija silikāts, Nātrija silīcija alumināts, nātrija aluminosilikāts
mt: E554, Silikat tas-sodju u tal-aluminju, Silikoaluminat tas-sodju, Aluminosilkat tas-sodju
nl: E554, Natriumaluminiumsilicaat, Natriumsilicoaluminaat, natriumaluminosilicaat
pl: E554, Krzemian glinowo-sodowy, Glinokrzemian sodu, krzemoglinian sodu
pt: E554, Silicato de alumínio e sódio, Silicoaluminato de sódio, aluminossilicato de sódio
ro: E554, Silicat de aluminiu și sodiu, Silicoaluminat sodiu, Aluminosilicat de sodiu
sk: E554, Kremičitan hlinitosodný, Kremičitohlinitan sodný, hlinitokremičitan sodný
sl: E554, Natrijev aluminijev silikat, natrijev silikoaluminat, natrijev aluminosilikat
sv: E554, Natriumaluminiumsilikat

en: E555, Potassium aluminium silicate
xx: E555
bg: E555, Калиевоалуминиев силикат
ca: E555, Silicat de potassi i alumini
cs: E555, Křemičitan draselno-hlinitý
da: E555, Kaliumaluminiumsilicat, Mica
de: E555, Kaliumaluminiumsilicat
el: E555, Πυριτικο αργιλιοκαλιο
es: E555, Silicato de potasio y aluminio
et: E555, Kaaliumalumiiniumsilikaat, Vilk
fi: E555, Kaliumalumiinisilikaatti, Kaliumalumiinisilikaattia
fr: E555, Silicate alumino-potassique
hu: E555, Kálium-alumínium-szilikát
it: E555, Silicato di potassio e alluminio
lt: E555, Kalio aliuminio silikatas
lv: E555, Kālija alumīnija silikāts
mt: E555, Silikat tal-potassju u tal-aluminju
nl: E555, Kaliumaluminiumsilicaat
pl: E555, Krzemian glinowo-potasowy
pt: E555, Silicato de alumínio e potássio
ro: E555, Silicat de aluminiu și potasiu
sk: E555, Kremičitan hlinitodraselný
sl: E555, Kalijev aluminijev silikat, sljuda
sv: E555, Kaliumaluminiumsilikat